North Carolina, session 2025, HB274.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Office of State
Budget and Management the nonrecurring sum of five million dollars ($5,000,000) for the
2025-2026 fiscal year to provide a directed grant to Crossnore Communities for Children, a
nonprofit organization, to provide services that are designed to address the foster care crisis in
this State, including the Promise for Hope Campaign, the Center for Trauma Resilient
Communities, the Bridging Families program, youth independent living, foster care, family
reunification and preservation services, and community engagement. All services supported
through these funds shall be open to children from across North Carolina and shall be offered in
and delivered from Winston-Salem, Crossnore, and Hendersonville through Crossnore
Communities for Children.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
*H274-v-1*